Utah statutes.
10-3-1311.   Complaints charging violations -- Procedure.

(1)  Any complaint against a person who is under the merit system, charging that person with a violation of this part, shall be filed and processed in accordance with the provisions of the merit system.

(2)  If the person charged with the violation is not under any merit system, then the complaint shall be filed with the mayor or city manager. The mayor or city manager shall investigate the complaint and shall give the person an opportunity to be heard. A written report of the findings and the recommendation of the mayor or city manager shall be filed with the governing body. If the governing body finds that the person has violated this part, it may dismiss, suspend, or take such other appropriate action with respect to the person.

